Utah statutes.
61-2c-504.   Authority to act on receipt of petition.
(1)  Upon receipt of a petition meeting the requirements of Section 61-2c-503,
the division may answer, initiate review proceedings, or appear in a
proceeding:
(a)  in the name of the defendant to the action; or
(b)  on behalf of the fund.
(2)  The division may settle a claim subject to:
(a)  the application of a petitioner; and
(b)  court approval.
